test/src/gt-desc-yamls/noun-even_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Evensyllable nouns belonging to GOAHTI-A, GOAHTI-I, GOAHTI-U, ALBMI, AIGI, STAHTA, IIJA, STRUKTUR, ADRENALIN, BUVSSAT

Tests:
  Noun - bietna: # GOAHTI-A
    bietna+N+Sg+Nom: bietna
    bietna+N+Sg+Gen: biena
    bietna+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: bietname
    bietna+N+Sg+Acc: biena
    bietna+N+Sg+Ill: bitnii
    bietna+N+Sg+Loc: bienas
    bietna+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: bienastan
    bietna+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: bienastat
    bietna+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: bienainan
    bietna+N+Pl+Acc: bienaid
    bietna+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: bienaidasat
    bietna+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: bienaideameguin
    bietna+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bienaš
    bietna+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: bienažis
    bietna+N+Der/laš+A+Ess: bienalažžan

  Noun - beaivi: # GOAHTI-I
    beaivi+N+Sg+Nom: beaivi
    beaivi+N+Sg+Gen: [beaivvi, beaivve]
    beaivi+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: beaiváme
    beaivi+N+Sg+Acc: beaivvi
    beaivi+N+Sg+Ill: beaivái
    beaivi+N+Sg+Loc: beaivvis
    beaivi+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: beaivvistan
    beaivi+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: beaivvistat
    beaivi+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: beivviinan
    beaivi+N+Pl+Acc: beivviid
    beaivi+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: beivviidasat
    beaivi+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: beivviideameguin
    beaivi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: beaivváš
    beaivi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: beaivvážis
    beaivi+N+Der/laš+A+Ess: beaivválažžan

  Noun - joavku: # GOAHTI-U
    joavku+N+Sg+Nom: joavku
    joavku+N+Sg+Gen: [joavkku, joavkko]
    joavku+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: jovkome
    joavku+N+Sg+Acc: joavkku
    joavku+N+Sg+Ill: jovkui
    joavku+N+Sg+Loc: joavkkus
    joavku+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: joavkkustan
    joavku+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: joavkkustat
    joavku+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: joavkkuinan
    joavku+N+Ess: joavkun
    joavku+N+Pl+Nom: joavkkut
    joavku+N+Pl+Gen: joavkkuid
    joavku+N+Pl+Acc: joavkkuid
    joavku+N+Pl+Ill: joavkkuide
    joavku+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: joavkkuidasat
    joavku+N+Pl+Loc: joavkkuin
    joavku+N+Pl+Com: joavkkuiguin
    joavku+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: joavkkuideameguin
    joavku+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: jovkkoš
    joavku+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: jovkkožis
    joavku+N+Der/laš+A+Ess: jovkkolažžan

  Noun - diehtu: # ALBMI
    diehtu+N+Sg+Nom: diehtu
    diehtu+N+Sg+Gen: dieđu
    diehtu+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: dihtome
    diehtu+N+Sg+Acc: dieđu
    diehtu+N+Sg+Ill: dihtui
    diehtu+N+Sg+Loc: dieđus
    diehtu+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: dieđustan
    diehtu+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: dieđustat
    diehtu+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: dieđuinan
    diehtu+N+Pl+Acc: dieđuid
    diehtu+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: dieđuidasat
    diehtu+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: dieđuideameguin
    diehtu+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: diđoš
    diehtu+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: diđožis
    diehtu+N+Der/laš+A+Ess: diđolažžan

  Noun - čoalli: # AIGI
    čoalli+N+Sg+Nom: čoalli
    čoalli+N+Sg+Gen: [čoali, čoale]
    čoalli+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: čoalláme
    čoalli+N+Sg+Acc: čoali
    čoalli+N+Sg+Ill: čoallái
    čoalli+N+Sg+Loc: čoalis
    čoalli+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: čoalistan
    čoalli+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: čoalistat
    čoalli+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: čoliinan
    čoalli+N+Pl+Acc: čoliid
    čoalli+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: čoliidasat
    čoalli+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: čoliideameguin
    čoalli+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: čoaláš
    čoalli+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: čoalážis
    čoalli+N+Der/laš+A+Ess: čoalálažžan

  Noun - proseassa: # STAHTA
    proseassa+N+Sg+Nom: proseassa
    proseassa+N+Sg+Gen: proseassa
    proseassa+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: proseassame
    proseassa+N+Sg+Acc: proseassa
    proseassa+N+Sg+Ill: prosessii
    proseassa+N+Sg+Loc: proseassas
    proseassa+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: proseassastan
    proseassa+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: proseassastat
    proseassa+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: proseassainan
    proseassa+N+Pl+Acc: proseassaid
    proseassa+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: proseassaidasat
    proseassa+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: proseassaideameguin
    proseassa+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: proseassaš
    proseassa+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: proseassažis
    proseassa+N+Der/laš+A+Ess: proseassalažžan

  Noun - kopiija: # IIJA
    kopiija+N+Sg+Nom: kopiija
    kopiija+N+Sg+Gen: kopiija
    kopiija+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: kopiijame
    kopiija+N+Sg+Acc: kopiija
    kopiija+N+Sg+Ill: [kopiijai, kopiijii]
    kopiija+N+Sg+Loc: kopiijas
    kopiija+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: kopiijastan
    kopiija+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: kopiijastat
    kopiija+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: kopiijainan
    kopiija+N+Pl+Acc: kopiijaid
    kopiija+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: kopiijaidasat
    kopiija+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: kopiijaideameguin
    kopiija+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: kopiijaš
    kopiija+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: kopiijažis
    kopiija+N+Der/laš+A+Ess: kopiijalažžan

  Noun - infrastruktuvra: # STRUKTUR
    infrastruktuvra+N+Sg+Nom: infrastruktuvra
    infrastruktuvra+N+Sg+Gen: infrastruktuvrra
    infrastruktuvra+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: infrastruktuvrame
    infrastruktuvra+N+Sg+Acc: infrastruktuvrra
    infrastruktuvra+N+Sg+Ill: infrastruktuvrii
    infrastruktuvra+N+Sg+Loc: infrastruktuvrras
    infrastruktuvra+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: infrastruktuvrrastan
    infrastruktuvra+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: infrastruktuvrrastat
    infrastruktuvra+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: infrastruktuvrrainan
    infrastruktuvra+N+Pl+Acc: infrastruktuvrraid
    infrastruktuvra+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: infrastruktuvrraidasat
    infrastruktuvra+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: infrastruktuvrraideameguin
    infrastruktuvra+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: infrastruktuvrraš
    infrastruktuvra+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: infrastruktuvrražis
    infrastruktuvra+N+Der/laš+A+Ess: infrastruktuvrralažžan

  Noun - insuliidna: # ADRENALIN
    insuliidna+N+Sg+Nom: insuliidna
    insuliidna+N+Sg+Gen: insuliinna
    insuliidna+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: insuliidname
    insuliidna+N+Sg+Acc: insuliinna
    insuliidna+N+Sg+Ill: insuliidnii
    insuliidna+N+Sg+Loc: insuliinnas
    insuliidna+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: insuliinnastan
    insuliidna+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: insuliinnastat
    insuliidna+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: insuliinnainan
    insuliidna+N+Pl+Acc: insuliinnaid
    insuliidna+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: insuliinnaidasat
    insuliidna+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: insuliinnaideameguin
    insuliidna+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: insuliinnaš
    insuliidna+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: insuliinnažis
    insuliidna+N+Der/laš+A+Ess: insuliinnalažžan

  Noun - leaŋggat: # BUVSSAT
    leaŋggat+N+Pl+Acc: leaŋggaid
    leaŋggat+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: leaŋggaidasat
    leaŋggat+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: leaŋggaideameguin
    leaŋggat+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom: leaŋggažat
    leaŋggat+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc: leaŋggažiin
